Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 10. POLITICAL PARTIES

SUBTITLE B. PARTIES NOMINATING BY PRIMARY ELECTION

CHAPTER 172. PRIMARY ELECTIONS

SUBCHAPTER A. NOMINATING BY PRIMARY ELECTION GENERALLY

Sec. 172.001. NOMINATING BY PRIMARY ELECTION REQUIRED. Except as otherwise provided by this code, a political party's nominees in the general election for offices of state and county government and the United States Congress must be nominated by primary election, held as provided by this code, if the party's nominee for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election received 20 percent or more of the total number of votes received by all candidates for governor in the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.002. NOMINATING BY PRIMARY ELECTION AUTHORIZED. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this code, a political party's nominees in the general election for offices of state and county government and the United States Congress may be nominated by primary election, held as provided by this code, if the party's nominee for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election received at least two percent but less than 20 percent of the total number of votes received by all candidates for governor in the election.

(b) If any nominee of a party is nominated by primary election, none of that party's nominees may be nominated that year by convention.

(c) For a political party to be entitled to hold a primary election under this section, the state chair, not later than one year before general election day, must deliver written notice to the secretary of state that the party will hold a primary election in the general election year.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 124, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 172.003. MAJORITY VOTE REQUIRED. Except as otherwise provided by this code, to receive a political party's nomination, a candidate in a primary election must receive a majority of the total number of votes received by all the candidates for the nomination.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.004. RUNOFF PRIMARY. (a) If no candidate for nomination to a particular office receives the vote required for nomination in the general primary election, a runoff primary election shall be held to determine the nomination.

(b) The candidates in a runoff for a nomination shall be determined and a tie vote in a runoff resolved as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 2, for a runoff for an election to office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

SUBCHAPTER B. APPLICATION FOR PLACE ON BALLOT

Sec. 172.021. APPLICATION REQUIRED. (a) To be entitled to a place on the general primary election ballot, a candidate must make an application for a place on the ballot.

(b) An application must, in addition to complying with Section 141.031, be accompanied by the appropriate filing fee or a petition in lieu of the filing fee that satisfies the requirements prescribed by Section 141.062. A political party may not require payment of a fee as a condition to applying for a place on the ballot as a candidate for county chair or precinct chair.

(b-1) Except as provided by Subsection (b-2), the authority receiving an application shall return it to the applicant as incomplete if the applicant submits payment of a fee that is returned for insufficient funds. The applicant may resubmit the application before the end of the filing period, but payment of the filing fee may not be made in the form of a check from the same account as that of the payment previously returned for insufficient funds.

(b-2) If a payment of a filing fee is returned for insufficient funds after the end of the filing period, the application is not considered to be timely filed, and the authority receiving the application shall inform the applicant that the application was not valid.

(c) An application filed by mail is considered to be filed at the time of its receipt by the appropriate authority.

(d) The circulation of a petition to be filed under this subchapter in connection with a candidate's application for a place on the ballot does not constitute candidacy or an announcement of candidacy for purposes of the automatic resignation provisions of Article XVI, Section 65, or Article XI, Section 11, of the Texas Constitution.

(e) A candidate for an office specified by Section 172.024(a)(8), (10), or (12), or for justice of the peace in a county with a population of more than 1.5 million, who chooses to pay the filing fee must also accompany the application with a petition for a place on the primary ballot as a candidate for judicial office that complies with the requirements prescribed for the petition authorized by Subsection (b), except that the minimum number of signatures that must appear on the petition required by this subsection is 250. If the candidate chooses to file the petition authorized by Subsection (b) in lieu of the filing fee, the minimum number of signatures required for that petition is increased by 250. Signatures on a petition filed under this subsection or Subsection (b) by a candidate covered by this subsection may not be obtained on the grounds of a county courthouse or courthouse annex.

(f) A political party's state executive committee by rule may require that an application for the office of county chair be accompanied by a nominating petition containing the signatures of at least 10 percent of the incumbent precinct chairs serving on the county executive committee.

(g) A candidate for the office of chief justice or justice, supreme court, or presiding judge or judge, court of criminal appeals, who chooses to pay the filing fee must also accompany the application with a petition that complies with the requirements prescribed for a petition authorized by Subsection (b), except that the minimum number of signatures that must appear on the petition required by this subsection is 50 from each court of appeals district.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 13(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 7.09, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 265, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 64, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 125, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 5.13, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 219, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 883, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 15(1), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 95 (S.B. 44), Sec. 3, eff. May 23, 2017.

Sec. 172.022. AUTHORITY WITH WHOM APPLICATION FILED. (a) An application for a place on the general primary election ballot must be filed with:

(1) the state chair, for an office filled by voters of more than one county; or

(2) the county chair or the secretary, if any, of the county executive committee, for an office filled by voters of a single county.

(b) Not later than the day before the last day of the filing period, the county chair shall post on the political party's Internet website or in the location where a candidate files for a place on the ballot notice of the address at which the county chair or secretary will be available to receive applications on the last day of the filing period. If both the county chair and the secretary will be available, the notice must contain the address at which each will be available. Section 1.006 does not apply to this subsection.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 65, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 126, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 204, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 172.0221. NOTICE TO CANDIDATE REGARDING POSTING OF CERTAIN INFORMATION. The authority with whom an application is filed must inform the candidate that the candidate's public mailing address and, if provided on the application, the candidate's electronic mail address will be posted by the secretary of state on the secretary's publicly viewable website.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 172.0222. REVIEW OF APPLICATION; NOTICE TO CANDIDATE. (a) If the application of this section conflicts with the application of Section 141.032, this section prevails.

(b) On the filing of an application for a place on the general primary election ballot, the authority with whom the application is filed shall review the application to determine whether it complies with the requirements as to form, content, and procedure that it must satisfy for the candidate's name to be placed on the general primary election ballot.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d) or (e), the review shall be completed not later than the fifth business day after the date the application is received by the authority.

(d) If an application is submitted fewer than five business days before the regular filing deadline, the review shall be completed not later than the first Friday after the regular filing deadline.

(e) If an application is accompanied by a petition, the petition is considered part of the application, and the review shall be completed as soon as practicable after the date the application is received by the authority. However, the petition is not considered part of the application for purposes of determining compliance with the requirements applicable to each document, and a deficiency in the requirements for one document may not be remedied by the contents of the other document. Unless the petition is challenged, the authority is only required to review the petition for facial compliance with the applicable requirements as to form, content, and procedure.

(f) A determination under this section that an application complies with the applicable requirements does not preclude a subsequent determination that the application does not comply, subject to Section 172.0223.

(g) If an application does not comply with the applicable requirements, the authority shall reject the application and immediately deliver to the candidate written notice of the reason for the rejection.

(h) This section does not apply to a determination of a candidate's eligibility.

(i) After the filing deadline:

(1) a candidate may not amend an application filed under Section 172.021; and

(2) the authority with whom the application is filed may not accept an amendment to an application filed under Section 172.021.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.0223. LIMITATION ON CHALLENGE OF APPLICATION. (a) If the application of this section conflicts with the application of Section 141.034, this section prevails.

(b) An application for a place on the general primary election ballot may not be challenged for compliance with the applicable requirements as to form, content, and procedure after the 50th day before the date of the election for which the application is made.

(c) This section does not apply to a determination of a candidate's eligibility.

(d) A challenge must state with specificity how the application does not comply with the applicable requirements as to form, content, and procedure. The authority's review of the challenge is limited to the specific items challenged and any response filed with the authority by the challenged candidate.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.023. REGULAR FILING PERIOD. (a) An application for a place on the general primary election ballot must be filed not later than 6 p.m. on the second Monday in December of an odd-numbered year unless the filing deadline is extended under Subchapter C.

(b) An application, other than an application for the office of precinct chair, may not be filed earlier than the 30th day before the date of the regular filing deadline. An application for the office of precinct chair may not be filed earlier than the 90th day before the date of the regular filing deadline.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 127, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 172.024. FILING FEE. (a) The filing fee for a candidate for nomination in the general primary election is as follows:

(1) United States senator

$5,000

(2) office elected statewide, except United States senator

3,750

(3) United States representative

3,125

(4) state senator

1,250

(5) state representative

750

(6) member, State Board of Education

300

(7) chief justice or justice, court of appeals, other than a justice specified by Subdivision (8)

1,875

(8) chief justice or justice of a court of appeals that serves a court of appeals district in which a county with a population of more than 1.2 million is wholly or partly situated

2,500

(9) district judge or judge specified by Section 52.092(d) for which this schedule does not otherwise prescribe a fee

1,500

(10) district or criminal district judge of a court in a judicial district wholly contained in a county with a population of more than 1.5 million

2,500

(11) judge, statutory county court, other than a judge specified by Subdivision (12)

1,500

(12) judge of a statutory county court in a county with a population of more than 1.5 million

2,500

(13) district attorney, criminal district attorney, or county attorney performing the duties of a district attorney . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,250

(14) county commissioner, district clerk, county clerk, sheriff, county tax assessor-collector, county treasurer, or judge, constitutional county court:

(A) county with a population of 200,000 or more . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,250

(B) county with a population of under 200,000 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 750

(15) justice of the peace or constable:

(A) county with a population of 200,000 or more . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,000

(B) county with a population of under 200,000 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 375

(16) county surveyor

75

(17) office of the county government for which this schedule does not otherwise prescribe a fee

750

(b) If a fee prescribed by Subsection (a) is declared invalid by a final judgment of a court, the secretary of state shall prescribe a filing fee consistent with the judgment to replace the invalidated fee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 14(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 265, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 142 (H.B. 964), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1229 (H.B. 1163), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 37 (H.B. 328), Sec. 3, eff. May 19, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 506 (S.B. 1016), Sec. 5.33, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 172.025. NUMBER OF PETITION SIGNATURES REQUIRED. The minimum number of signatures that must appear on the petition authorized by Section 172.021(b) is:

(1) 5,000, for a statewide office; or

(2) for a district, county, or precinct office, the lesser of:

(A) 500; or

(B) two percent of the total vote received in the district, county, or precinct, as applicable, by all the candidates for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election, unless that number is under 50, in which case the required number of signatures is the lesser of:

(i) 50; or

(ii) 20 percent of that total vote.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 13(c), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 496, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 172.026. RESTRICTION ON PETITION SIGNER. On signing a petition to be filed under Section 172.021, the signer becomes ineligible to vote in a primary election or participate in a convention of another political party during the voting year in which the primary election is held.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 13(c), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 172.027. STATEMENT ON PETITION. The following statement must appear at the top of each page of a petition to be filed under Section 172.021: "I know that the purpose of this petition is to entitle (insert candidate's name) to have his or her name placed on the ballot for the office of (insert office title, including any place number or other distinguishing number) for the (insert political party's name) primary election. I understand that by signing this petition I become ineligible to vote in a primary election or participate in a convention of another party, including a party not holding a primary election, during the voting year in which this primary election is held."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 13(c), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 90, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 128, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 172.028. STATE CHAIR'S CERTIFICATION OF NAMES FOR PLACEMENT ON GENERAL PRIMARY BALLOT. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the state chair shall certify to the secretary of state for placement on the general primary election ballot the name of each candidate who files with the chair an application that complies with Section 172.021(b). The secretary of state shall post on the secretary's Internet website that is viewable by the public:

(1) the certified list; and

(2) for each certified candidate, the public mailing address and, if provided by the candidate, the electronic mail address at which the candidate receives correspondence relating to the candidate's campaign.

(b) Not later than the ninth day after the date of the regular filing deadline, the state chair shall notify the county chair in each county in which the candidate's name is to appear on the ballot that the certification has been posted by the secretary of state.

(c) A candidate's name may not be certified:

(1) if, before delivering the certification, the state chair learns that the name is to be omitted from the ballot under Section 172.057; or

(2) for an office for which the candidate's application is invalid under Section 141.033.

(d) A copy of each certification shall be made available on request, without charge, to each newspaper published in this state and to each licensed radio and television station in this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1. eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 129, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 84 (S.B. 1703), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 172.029. SUBMISSION AND COMPILATION OF INFORMATION PERTAINING TO CANDIDATES. (a) For each general primary election, the state chair and each county chair shall electronically submit the following information:

(1) the name of each candidate who files an application for a place on the ballot with the chair, including an application for the office of a political party;

(2) the name of each candidate whose application meets the requirements of Section 172.021 and is accepted by the chair, as the name is to appear on the ballot;

(3) the candidate's address as shown on the application;

(4) the date on which the candidate filed the application; and

(5) any additional information required by the secretary of state.

(b) The secretary of state shall continuously maintain an online database of information submitted under this section. The database must be accessible by the county and precinct chairs of the party that submitted the information. Any changes in the party's county or precinct chairs shall be reported to the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules regarding the public availability of information submitted under this section.

(c) The secretary of state may by rule prescribe a deadline by which the state chair must deliver the chair's submission regarding a candidate to the secretary of state, and each county chair shall deliver a copy of the chair's submission regarding a candidate to the county clerk, the state chair, and the secretary of state when the chair accepts the application. The secretary of state may by rule prescribe a deadline for the delivery of a submission under this subsection.

(d) The secretary of state shall be notified if a candidate withdraws, dies, or is declared ineligible, or if the candidate's application is determined not to comply with the applicable requirements. The secretary of state shall adopt rules implementing this subsection.

(e) The secretary of state shall:

(1) archive and keep available for inspection a list of all candidates for whom information has been submitted under this section; and

(2) prescribe rules for submitting the list electronically and methodology for distribution to each county clerk and state chair.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 130, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 360 (H.B. 1265), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 570 (H.B. 3270), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER C. WITHDRAWAL, DEATH, AND INELIGIBILITY OF CANDIDATE

Sec. 172.051. WITHDRAWAL, DEATH, OR INELIGIBILITY GENERALLY. With respect to withdrawal, death, or ineligibility of a candidate in a primary election, this subchapter supersedes Subchapter A, Chapter 145, to the extent of any conflict.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., Ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.052. WITHDRAWAL FROM GENERAL PRIMARY. (a) A candidate for nomination may not withdraw from the general primary election after the first day after the date of the regular filing deadline for the general primary election.

(b) A withdrawal request for the general primary must be filed with the authority with whom the withdrawing candidate's application for a place on the ballot is required to be filed.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 84 (S.B. 1703), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 172.053. ADMINISTRATIVE DECLARATION OF INELIGIBILITY AFTER POLLS CLOSE. Except for a judicial action in which a candidate's eligibility is in issue, after the polls close on primary election day and before the final canvass for the office sought by the candidate is completed, a candidate for nomination may be declared ineligible only by the presiding officer of the primary's final canvassing authority for that office.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.054. EXTENDED FILING DEADLINE. (a) The deadline for filing an application for a place on the general primary election ballot is extended as provided by this section if a candidate who has made an application that complies with the applicable requirements:

(1) dies on or after the fifth day before the date of the regular filing deadline and on or before the first day after the date of the regular filing deadline;

(2) holds the office for which the application was made and withdraws or is declared ineligible on the date of the regular filing deadline or the first day after the date of the regular filing deadline; or

(3) withdraws or is declared ineligible during the period prescribed by Subdivision (2), and at the time of the withdrawal or declaration of ineligibility no other candidate has made an application that complies with the applicable requirements for the office sought by the withdrawn or ineligible candidate.

(b) An application for an office sought by a withdrawn, deceased, or ineligible candidate must be filed not later than 6 p.m. of the fifth day after the date of the regular filing deadline. An application filed by mail with the state chair is not timely if received later than 5 p.m. of the fifth day after the date of the regular filing deadline.

(c) An extension of the filing deadline under this section applies only to the primary election of the political party for which the withdrawn, deceased, or ineligible candidate applied for a place on the ballot.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 131, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 589 (S.B. 904), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 172.055. PUBLIC NOTICE OF EXTENDED FILING. (a) If the deadline for filing applications is extended, notice of the extended filing shall be given as provided by this section.

(b) The authority with whom the withdrawn, deceased, or ineligible candidate's application was filed shall prepare a notice identifying the candidate and the office for which the filing deadline is extended and stating the extended deadline.

(c) Not later than 24 hours after the candidate withdraws or is declared ineligible or after the authority preparing the notice learns of the candidate's death, as applicable, the authority shall:

(1) deliver a copy of the notice to:

(A) at least one daily newspaper published in the county or, if none, at least one weekly newspaper published there, if any, for a notice prepared by the county chair;

(B) at least three daily newspapers that regularly maintain a news representative at the State Capitol, for a notice applicable to a statewide office; or

(C) at least one daily newspaper published in each county wholly or partly situated in the district or, if none, at least one weekly newspaper published there, if any, for a notice prepared by the state chair for a district office;

(2) post the notice on the authority's Internet website, if one is maintained; and

(3) send a copy of the notice to:

(A) the secretary of state, to be posted on the secretary of state's Internet website, for a candidate for an office filled by voters of more than one county; or

(B) the county clerk, to be posted on the county's Internet website, for an office filled by voters of a single county.

(d) A county or state chair's failure to perform a duty prescribed by this section is cause for the officer's removal by the executive committee over which the chair presides.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 132, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.056. SUPPLEMENTAL LIST OF CANDIDATES. (a) If the deadline for filing applications is extended, an electronic submission shall be made containing the name of each candidate:

(1) who files an application that complies with the applicable requirements during the extended filing period; and

(2) whose name is not submitted under Section 172.029.

(b) Notification shall be made as prescribed by Section 172.029 that additional names have been added during the extended period.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 133, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 172.057. WITHDRAWN, DECEASED, OR INELIGIBLE CANDIDATE'S NAME OMITTED FROM GENERAL PRIMARY BALLOT. A candidate's name shall be omitted from the general primary election ballot if the candidate withdraws, dies, or is declared ineligible on or before the first day after the date of the regular filing deadline.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1164 (H.B. 2817), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 589 (S.B. 904), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 172.058. DECEASED OR INELIGIBLE CANDIDATE'S NAME TO APPEAR ON GENERAL PRIMARY BALLOT. (a) If a candidate who has made an application for a place on the general primary election ballot that complies with the applicable requirements dies or is declared ineligible after the first day after the date of the regular filing deadline, the candidate's name shall be placed on the ballot and the votes cast for the candidate shall be counted and entered on the official election returns in the same manner as for the other candidates.

(b) If the deceased or ineligible candidate receives the vote required for nomination, the appropriate executive committee may select the nominee and certify the nominee's name for placement on the general election ballot as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 145, for filling a vacancy in a nomination.

(c) In a race in which a runoff is required, if the deceased or ineligible candidate received the vote that would entitle the candidate to a place on the runoff primary ballot or tied for that number of votes, the candidates in the runoff shall be determined in the regular manner but without regard to the votes received by the deceased or ineligible candidate.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 24(a), (b), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 134, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 589 (S.B. 904), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 172.059. WITHDRAWAL FROM RUNOFF PRIMARY. (a) A candidate for nomination may not withdraw from the runoff primary election after 5 p.m. of the 3rd day after the state canvass under Section 172.120.

(b) A withdrawal request for the runoff primary must be filed with the state chair, for a statewide or district office, or with the county chair, for a county or precinct office.

(c) If a runoff candidate withdraws, the remaining candidate is the nominee and the runoff election for that office is not held.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 135, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 84 (S.B. 1703), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 172.060. DECEASED OR INELIGIBLE CANDIDATE'S NAME TO APPEAR ON RUNOFF PRIMARY BALLOT. (a) If a runoff primary candidate dies or is declared ineligible before runoff primary election day, the candidate's name shall be placed on the ballot.

(b) If a deceased or ineligible candidate receives the vote required for nomination, the appropriate executive committee may select the nominee and certify the nominee's name for placement on the general election ballot as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 145, for filling a vacancy in a nomination.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.061. CANDIDATE FOR PARTY OFFICE. (a) Except for Sections 172.058(b), 172.059(c), and 172.060(b), this subchapter applies to a candidate for county chair or precinct chair.

(b) If a runoff candidate for county chair or precinct chair withdraws, the remaining candidate is considered to be elected and the runoff election for that office is not held.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 136, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER D. BALLOT

Sec. 172.081. PRIMARY COMMITTEE. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a primary committee is established in each county having a county executive committee. The primary committee consists of:

(1) the county chair; and

(2) four other members of the county executive committee, appointed by the county chair subject to the executive committee's approval.

(b) The county executive committee by resolution may provide that the primary committee consist of more or fewer than five members or that a primary committee not be established. If a primary committee is not established, the county chair shall perform the duties of the primary committee prescribed by this chapter unless the county executive committee designates another member of the committee for that purpose.

(c) The county chair serves as chair of the primary committee.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 137, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 172.082. ORDER OF NAMES ON GENERAL PRIMARY BALLOT: REGULAR DRAWING. (a) The order of the candidates' names on the general primary election ballot for each county shall be determined by a drawing.

(b) The county chair or the county chair's designee shall conduct the drawing unless the county executive committee provides by resolution that the drawing be conducted by the primary committee.

(c) The drawing shall be conducted not later than the 10th day after the date of the regular filing deadline for the general primary election.

(d) Each candidate affected by a drawing is entitled to be present or have a representative present at the drawing.

(e) The county chair shall post notice of the date, hour, and place of the drawing for at least 24 consecutive hours immediately before the drawing begins. The notice shall be posted on the party's Internet website, if the party maintains a website. If the party does not maintain a website, the notice shall be posted on the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the commissioners court. All candidates who provide an e-mail address on their filing form shall be notified electronically.

(f) The state chair shall conduct the drawing if:

(1) the county chair requests that the state chair conduct the drawing; or

(2) the county chair or the county chair's designee fails to conduct the drawing by the deadline set in this section.

(g) A designee appointed by the county chair to conduct the drawing under this section must be:

(1) a member of the county executive committee; or

(2) if no member of the county executive committee is available to conduct the drawing, a resident of the county served by the committee who is affiliated with the same political party.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 138, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1318 (S.B. 100), Sec. 37, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 5, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 84 (S.B. 1703), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.083. REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF BALLOT BY PRIMARY COMMITTEE. If a primary committee was established, before having the official ballots for a general primary election printed, the county chair shall submit the format for the official ballot to the primary committee for its review and approval.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 139, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.084. ORDER OF NAMES ON RUNOFF PRIMARY BALLOT. (a) The order of the candidates' names on the runoff primary election ballot for each county shall be in the same order as on the general primary election ballot.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 140, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.085. NAME OF PARTY ON BALLOT. The name of the political party holding a primary election shall be placed at the top of the primary ballot.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.086. PLEDGE ON BALLOT. The following pledge shall be placed on the primary election ballot above the listing of candidates' names: "I am a (insert appropriate political party) and understand that I am ineligible to vote or participate in another political party's primary election or convention during this voting year."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.087. REFERENDUM ORDERED BY STATE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE. The state executive committee may provide by resolution that a proposal to include a demand for specific legislation or any other matter in the party's platform or resolutions be submitted to a vote by placement on the general primary election ballot. The state executive committee shall prescribe the wording of the proposition submitting a proposal.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.088. VOTER PETITION FOR REFERENDUM. (a) Voters by petition may require that a proposal to include a demand for specific legislation or any other matter in a political party's platform or resolutions be submitted to a vote in the party's general primary election by placement on the general primary election ballot.

(b) Subject to Subsection (c), a petition under this section must satisfy the requirements prescribed by Section 141.062 for a candidate's petition and must state the proposal that is to be submitted. The petition is otherwise subject to the applicable provisions of Subchapter C, Chapter 141, except as provided by this section.

(c) A political party by rule may provide for restricting petition signers on the basis of party alignment or preference.

(d) The petition must be filed with the state chair of the political party holding the primary to which the petition applies before the date of the regular filing deadline for candidates' applications for a place on the primary ballot.

(e) The minimum number of signatures that must appear on the petition is five percent of the total vote received by all candidates for governor in the party's most recent gubernatorial general primary election.

(f) A signer's voter registration is not required to be in any particular territory.

(g) The state executive committee shall prescribe the wording of the ballot language for the proposition submitted by the petition.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 141, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.089. ORDER OF PARTY OFFICES ON BALLOT. The party offices of county chair and precinct chair shall be listed on the primary election ballot after the public offices with the office of county chair listed first.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 142, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 172.090. SEPARATE BALLOT FOR OFFICE OF PRECINCT CHAIR. (a) In a primary election, the county executive committee may provide by resolution, order, or other official action for voting by separate paper ballot for the office of precinct chair.

(b) The separate paper ballot for precinct chair must conform to the applicable standards governing regular paper ballots, except that the ballot shall be limited to the office of precinct chair.

(c) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the ballot for precinct chair consistent with this section.

(d) The county chair or the county clerk may produce and number ballots by hand under this section.

(e) The secretary of state shall adopt rules for conducting a hand count of ballots under this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 143, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER E. CONDUCT OF ELECTION

Sec. 172.111. CONDUCT OF PRIMARY ELECTION GENERALLY. (a) With respect to the conduct of a primary election, this subchapter supersedes Title 6 to the extent of any conflict.

(b) The county executive committee shall supervise the overall conduct of a primary election in each county.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Sec. 172.1111. POSTING NOTICE OF CONVENTIONS REQUIRED. (a) Before the opening of the polls during the early voting period and on election day, the presiding judge shall post at each outside door through which a voter may enter the building in which the polling place is located a written notice in bold print of the date, hour, and place for each precinct, county, senatorial, or state convention that a voter in the precinct may be eligible to attend during the election year.

(b) Notice posted under this section may include:

(1) the website of the county party and state party; and

(2) any other information deemed necessary by the state executive committee.

(b-1) The state chair shall develop a form for the notice that may be used statewide. The judge is not required to use an officially prescribed form for the notice, but must include any information required by this section.

(b-2) A state chair, county chair, or precinct chair shall provide the presiding judge with the necessary information respecting the chair's associated convention.

(c) The notice must remain posted continuously through the early voting period and on election day.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 472, Sec. 44, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 61, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1350, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.1112. NOTICE OF ELECTION. (a) The county clerk shall post a notice of the election and a notice of consolidated precincts, if applicable, in the manner prescribed by Section 4.003(b) for general and special elections. The notice of the election shall be posted on the county's Internet website, if the county maintains a website. If the county does not maintain a website, the notice shall be posted on the bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the commissioners court.

(b) The requirements prescribed by Section 4.004 for the contents of the notice of a general or special election apply to the notice of election required by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Election Code Sec. 172.1111 by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 7.11, eff. Aug. 28, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 144, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.1113. COUNTY CHAIR PERMITTED IN POLLING PLACE. (a) In this section, "voting period" means the period beginning when the polls open for voting and ending when the polls close or the last voter has voted, whichever is later.

(b) The county chair of a political party conducting a primary election may be in a polling place during the voting period as necessary to perform administrative functions related to the conduct of the election.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 333 (H.B. 1996), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 172.1114. DISTRIBUTION OF NOTICE OF CONVENTIONS. (a) A political party may prepare a notice not larger than letter-sized for distribution to each voter participating in the party's primary election at the time the voter is accepted for voting.

(b) The notice may include:

(1) information describing the party's convention process;

(2) information detailing the time and place of the party's first-level convention process;

(3) contact information for the county and state political parties; and

(4) website links for information and registration for party conventions.

(c) The state chair of a political party shall prescribe a form for a notice that may be used in any county. A county chair of a political party may prescribe a specific notice for the county chair's county. The same notice must be used in all precincts within a county.

(d) A notice must be approved by the secretary of state. If a county chair of a political party uses the form of notice prescribed by the state chair, only the convention location and time may be added without the secretary of state's approval.

(e) A county chair of a political party shall supply or contract with the authority to supply a notice prepared according to this section to the authority conducting the election not later than the 30th day before the date early voting by personal appearance begins. The authority's preparation of copies is a necessary expense incurred in connection with a primary election under Section 173.001.

(f) The secretary of state shall prescribe procedures and adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.112. WRITE-IN VOTING. Write-in voting in a primary election is not permitted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 145, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.113. UNOFFICIAL TABULATION OF PRECINCT RESULTS. (a) The authority establishing a central counting station shall prepare the unofficial tabulation of precinct results.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

(d) The authority shall make periodic announcements of the current state of the tabulation, including by posting the announcements on the Internet website of the county, if the county maintains a website.

(e) On completing the tabulation, the authority shall:

(1) deliver it to the general custodian; or

(2) post the tabulation on:

(A) the county's website; and

(B) if required by secretary of state rule, the secretary of state's website.

(f) A person employed to assist in the preparation of the unofficial tabulation is entitled to compensation at the same rate as an election clerk serving in the election.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 146, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 34, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 24, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 6.003, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 172.114. DISPOSITION OF POLL LIST. The general custodian of election records shall preserve the poll lists maintained for a primary election for 22 months.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 35, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.1141. LIST OF REGISTERED VOTERS FOR CONVENTION. (a) A county clerk shall prepare a list under this section unless, not later than the 90th day before the date of the primary, the county chair notifies the county clerk that the chair does not require a list. At the same time the acceptance of each voter for voting in the general primary election is indicated on the precinct list of registered voters furnished for use in the election, the acceptance of the voter shall also be indicated on the list furnished for use in the party's conventions.

(b) If a county records the acceptance of a voter electronically, the state chair or county chair may request and the county clerk shall provide not later than the date of the local general primary canvass an electronic document listing the persons who voted in the party primary, the unique identifier assigned to each person, and whether the person voted early in person or by mail, or voted in person on election day.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 501, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 36, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.115. DISPOSITION OF LIST OF REGISTERED VOTERS. (a) Subject to Subsection (b), the voter registrar shall preserve each precinct list of registered voters that is used for a primary election for 22 months.

(b) The registrar shall return each list that is to be used in a subsequent primary election to the authority responsible for distributing the election supplies not earlier than the fourth day before the date it is needed for the subsequent primary.

(c) The presiding judge shall retain and provide at the appropriate time the list of registered voters to be used in the party's conventions if the list was produced under Section 172.1141.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 12(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 501, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 37, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 26, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.116. LOCAL CANVASS RELATING TO CANDIDATES WHO FILED AN APPLICATION FOR A PLACE ON THE BALLOT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GENERAL REQUIREMENTS. (a) The county chair or the county chair's designee and, if available, at least one member of the county executive committee selected by the county executive committee shall canvass the precinct election returns for the county.

(b) The county chair or the county chair's designee and any selected county executive committee member shall convene to conduct the local canvass on the second Thursday after election day at the hour specified by the county chair and posted on the county party website or the commissioners court bulletin board if the county organization of the political party does not maintain a website.

(c) The county clerk shall prepare and electronically submit to the secretary of state a report of the results of the canvass, which must include:

(1) the total number of votes cast in each precinct for each candidate or measure; and

(2) the number of counted and uncounted provisional ballots cast in each precinct.

(d) The final canvass is concluded when the chair digitally certifies the canvass report on the secretary of state's website. The posting on the site that the results are final completes the canvass report. The chair is not required to file any additional notice or report with the county clerk.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 15(2), eff. September 1, 2015.

(f) The local canvass is open to the general public.

(g) The official result of the primary election, except for offices canvassed at the state level, is determined from the local canvass of precinct returns and shall be posted to the secretary of state's website.

(h) A designee appointed by the county chair to conduct the local canvass under this section must be:

(1) a member of the county executive committee; or

(2) if no member of the county executive committee is available to conduct the canvass, a resident of the county served by the committee who is affiliated with the same political party.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 275, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 66, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 147, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 52, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235 (S.B. 1970), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 15(2), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 38, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 27, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.117. CERTIFICATION OF NOMINEES WHO FILED AN APPLICATION FOR A PLACE ON THE BALLOT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GENERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR COUNTY AND PRECINCT OFFICES FOR PLACEMENT ON GENERAL ELECTION BALLOT. (a) The county chair shall certify by posting on the secretary of state's website a notation next to the name and address of each primary candidate who is nominated for a county or precinct office for placement on the general election ballot. The chair shall digitally execute an affidavit certifying that the returns posted on the secretary of state's website are the correct and complete returns. The secretary of state shall adopt by rule a process to allow the chair to submit the affidavit digitally.

(a-1) The secretary of state shall develop appropriate notations to describe the status of each candidate. The notations shall include:

(1) "filed";

(2) "accepted";

(3) "rejected";

(4) "withdrew";

(5) "lost primary";

(6) "in runoff";

(7) "lost runoff";

(8) "deceased";

(9) "declared ineligible"; or

(10) "nominee for general election."

(a-2) The county chair shall update the notations after each general primary and runoff primary election, unless the secretary of state's Internet website automatically updates the notations based on election returns. After any withdrawal or death of a candidate, and subsequent replacement of the candidate on the ballot, the chair shall notify the state chair, who shall update the notation on the website. All notations must be completed and accurate on the date prescribed by the secretary of state by rule to ensure that an authority printing general election ballots may rely on the information.

(a-3) After the notations have been placed on the website and the affidavit has been filed as required by Subsection (a), the authority preparing the official general election ballot shall use the list of candidates named on the secretary of state's website as the nominees for general election in preparing the general election ballot.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 15(3), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) A candidate's name may not be certified if, before delivering the certification, the county chair learns that the name is to be omitted from the ballot under Section 145.035.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 148, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 15(3), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 39, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.118. NOTICE OF PERSONS ELECTED AS PARTY OFFICERS. (a) Not later than the 20th day after the date the local canvass is completed, the county chair shall post on the secretary of state's website the names of the persons elected as county chair and precinct chairs for the county.

(b) The notice must include:

(1) each party officer's address;

(2) each precinct chair's precinct number; and

(3) each precinct officer's phone number and e-mail address, if supplied by the officer.

(c) The secretary of state shall make information described by Subsections (b)(1) and (3) available to the state chair, but not available to the public.

(d) Any appointment to fill a vacancy in the office of precinct or county chair shall be posted on the secretary of state's website.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 149, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 40, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.120. STATE CANVASS RELATING TO CANDIDATES WHO FILED AN APPLICATION FOR A PLACE ON THE BALLOT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GENERAL REQUIREMENTS. (a) The state chair shall canvass the county election returns.

(b) The state chair shall conduct the state canvass for the general primary election not later than:

(1) the second Sunday after general primary election day, for an election in which three or more candidates are seeking election to the same office; or

(2) the 22nd day after general primary election day, for an election not described by Subdivision (1).

(b-1) Not later than the third Saturday after runoff primary election day, the state chair shall complete the state canvass of the runoff primary election.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 , Sec. 15(4), eff. September 1, 2015.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 , Sec. 15(4), eff. September 1, 2015.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 , Sec. 15(4), eff. September 1, 2015.

(f) The secretary of state shall preserve and archive on the secretary's website all of the information pertaining to candidates and the canvass results.

(g) The state canvass is open to the general public.

(h) The official result of the primary election for offices canvassed by the state chair is determined from its canvass of the county returns.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S. ch. 14, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 21(a), (b), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 151, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1235 (S.B. 1970), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 15(4), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 172.121. CERTIFICATION OF CANDIDATES FOR STATEWIDE AND DISTRICT OFFICES FOR PLACEMENT ON RUNOFF BALLOT. (a) The state chair shall certify on the secretary of state's website for placement on the runoff primary election ballot the name of each general primary candidate for a statewide or district office who is to be a candidate in the runoff.

(b) The secretary of state shall update the status of each candidate as appropriate by posting next to the candidate's name on the secretary of state's website whether the person lost in the primary or is in a runoff for the position as soon as practicable after the state canvass of the general primary election is completed.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 152, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 29, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.122. CERTIFICATION OF NOMINEES WHO FILED AN APPLICATION FOR A PLACE ON THE BALLOT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GENERAL REQUIREMENTS FOR STATEWIDE AND DISTRICT OFFICES TO SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) The state chair shall certify by posting on the secretary of state's website the name and address of each primary candidate who is nominated for a statewide or district office. The state chair shall execute and file digitally with the secretary of state an affidavit certifying that the returns posted on the secretary of state's website are the correct and complete returns. The secretary of state shall adopt by rule a process to allow the chair to submit the affidavit digitally.

(b) Not later than the 20th day after the date the state canvass is completed, the state chair shall submit the certification to the secretary of state for posting on the secretary of state's Internet website.

(c) The secretary of state shall create a system for the state chair to submit the information to the secretary of state for posting on the secretary of state's Internet website under Subsection (b).

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 153, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 42, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.123. ENTERING PRIMARY RESULTS IN ELECTION REGISTER. (a) The county clerk shall enter the precinct results for the primary election in the election register maintained for the commissioners court.

(b) The secretary of state shall enter the primary election results for statewide and district offices in the election register maintained for the governor.

(c) The requirements of this section may be met by entering the results on the secretary of state's website if the secretary of state maintains a website for that purpose.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 163, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 43, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.124. REPORTING PRECINCT RESULTS TO SECRETARY OF STATE RELATING TO CANDIDATES WHO FILED AN APPLICATION FOR A PLACE ON THE BALLOT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE GENERAL REQUIREMENTS. (a) For each primary election, the county clerk shall prepare a report of the number of votes, including early voting votes, received in each county election precinct by each candidate for an office, other than a party office, as provided by Section 67.017 for the report of precinct results for a general election.

(b) The county clerk shall deliver the report to the secretary of state not later than the 30th day after primary election day.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by this section, the report is subject to the requirements prescribed by Section 67.017 for the report prepared for a general election.

(d) The secretary of state shall create and maintain an electronic system for submission of the report.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 54, Sec. 2(d), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 114, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 2.64; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 35, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 154, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1179 (S.B. 1073), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 44, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 31, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 172.125. ADDITIONAL PROCEDURE FOR ACCEPTING VOTERS IN RUNOFF. (a) For a runoff primary election, the voter registrar shall make appropriate notations to indicate the preceding party primary for which the voter was accepted for voting, if any.

(b) An election officer at a runoff primary election polling place shall determine whether the name of a voter offering to vote is noted on the list as having been accepted for voting in another party's primary. If the voter's name is so noted, the voter may not be accepted for voting at the runoff unless the voter executes an affidavit stating that the voter did not vote in the primary or participate in a convention of another party during the same voting year.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 67, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1055 (H.B. 3103), Sec. 10, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 172.126. JOINT PRIMARIES AUTHORIZED. (a) The primary elections in a county may be conducted jointly at the regular polling places designated for the general election for state and county officers. The county clerk shall supervise the overall conduct of the joint primary elections. This section applies to the conduct of joint primary elections notwithstanding and in addition to other applicable provisions of this code. The decision to conduct a joint general primary election or runoff primary election, as applicable, must be made by majority vote of the full membership of the commissioners court and with the unanimous approval of the county clerk and the county chair of each political party required to nominate candidates by primary election.

(b) The county clerk shall determine whether to consolidate election precincts under Section 42.009 and shall designate the location of the polling place in a consolidated precinct. To the extent possible, a polling place shall be designated that will accommodate the precinct conventions of each political party. If a polling place, whether for a regular or consolidated precinct, is not suitable for more than one precinct convention, the polling place may be used by the party whose candidate for governor received the most votes in the county in the most recent gubernatorial general election.

(c) One set of election officers shall conduct the primary elections at each polling place. Not later than the second Monday in December preceding the primary elections, each county chair shall deliver to the county clerk a list of the names of the election judges and clerks for that party. The presiding judge of each party, or alternate judge if applicable, serves as a co-judge for the precinct. If an eligible presiding co-judge and alternate co-judge cannot be found to serve for a particular party in a precinct, a joint primary may not be conducted in that precinct, and that precinct must be consolidated with another precinct that has an eligible presiding co-judge and alternate co-judge to serve for each party. The county clerk shall appoint the election clerks in accordance with rules prescribed by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall prescribe the maximum number of clerks that may be appointed for each precinct. The early voting ballot board and any central counting station shall also be composed of and administered by one set of election officers that provides representation for each party, and the secretary of state by rule shall prescribe procedures consistent with this subsection for the appointment of those officers.

(d) Each co-judge has the law enforcement duties and powers provided under Section 32.075. Each co-judge has the exclusive authority to conduct challenges on the eligibility of voters, tabulate the votes, and deliver the election returns in the primary of the party with which that judge is affiliated or aligned.

(e) The county clerk shall obtain the candidates' names that are to appear on the primary ballot, office sought, and candidate and office ballot order from the certified list on the secretary of state's website.

(f) The county clerk shall determine the ballot format and voting system for each election precinct and shall procure the election equipment and supplies.

(g) A separate set of ballot boxes or other suitable containers approved by the secretary of state shall be used for each party's primary, except that one set of ballot boxes or other containers may be used in a joint primary using an electronic voting system in which the ballots are deposited by the voters directly into a unit of automatic tabulating equipment. The lists of registered voters and the voters' registration certificates shall be marked and stamped to show the appropriate party affiliation for each voter. A separate list of registered voters shall be used for each party's primary. The secretary of state by rule shall prescribe requirements to ensure that one party's ballot is readily distinguished from another's, which may include the use of different colors of ink.

(g-1) A voter shall be allowed privacy to the extent possible when indicating the voter's choice as to which political party's primary the voter chooses to vote in. A voter may indicate, without verbalizing, the voter's choice by pointing to which party's ballot the voter chooses. The secretary of state shall prescribe a sign to inform voters of this option, and the co-judges of each polling place shall post the sign beside the signature roster.

(h) Separate election returns shall be prepared for each party's primary and shall be canvassed as provided by this code.

(i) The secretary of state by rule shall prescribe the procedures necessary to implement this section to ensure the orderly and proper administration of joint primary elections.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1316, Sec. 37, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 45, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.127. CONTENT OF SIGN USED TO IDENTIFY POLLING PLACE LOCATION. (a) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(4), eff. September 1, 2017.

(b) The presiding judge or alternate presiding judge for the precinct may post signs at a polling place for a primary election or a primary runoff election that:

(1) identify the names of, or symbols representing, any political parties holding an election at the polling place; and

(2) do not refer to a candidate or measure on the ballot.

(c) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to provide that signs posted as authorized by Subsection (b) in the same county have a similar size and format.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (H.B. 719), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 46, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 64(4), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.128. ALTERNATIVE PRIMARY PROCEDURE FOR COUNTIES WITHOUT COUNTY PARTY LEADERSHIP. (a) Notwithstanding a conflicting provision of this code, a primary election that is required for the nomination of a political party to a statewide office, a multicounty district office, or a presidential primary election shall be held in accordance with this section in a county in which:

(1) the office of county chair is vacant and there is an insufficient number of members serving on the county executive committee to fill a vacancy on the committee; and

(2) the party is unable to establish a temporary executive committee under Section 171.027.

(b) On request of the state chair of a political party, a county clerk, county tax assessor-collector, or county elections administrator, as appropriate, shall contract with the state chair to hold a primary election under this section.

(c) The county clerk may combine voting precincts for an election held under this section to the extent necessary to adequately serve the voters.

(d) Voting shall be conducted at least during the hours that the county clerk's main business office is regularly open for business.

(e) The election returns for an election held under this section shall be delivered to the state chair of the applicable political party.

(f) A precinct convention is not required to be held following a primary election conducted under this section.

(g) A contract for election services entered into under this section shall provide that the county shall be eligible to be reimbursed for primary election expenses in the same manner a county chair would be reimbursed under Subchapter D, Chapter 173.

(h) Election officers appointed to serve a polling place for a primary election conducted under this section may be affiliated or aligned with any political party.

(i) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to implement this section in accordance with the conduct of elections and with party rule.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1262 (H.B. 630), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 264 (S.B. 1448), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 47, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.129. STATEMENTS MADE BY ELECTION OFFICER WHEN PRIMARIES CONDUCTED AT SAME LOCATION. (a) This section applies only to a polling place used to hold an election for more than one political party.

(b) An election officer conducting a primary election may not:

(1) suggest a political party's ballot to a voter; or

(2) discuss any race on the ballot with a voter.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 48, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 172.130. ACTION BY STATE CHAIR TO MEET DEADLINES FOR CONDUCT OF PRIMARY. (a) Notwithstanding a conflicting provision of this code, the state chair, or the state chair's designee, may perform any administrative duty of the county chair, county chair's designee, or county executive committee related to the conduct of a primary election that has not been performed in the time required by law, including the submission of candidate information under Section 172.029, drawing for ballot order under Section 172.082, and canvassing returns under Section 172.116.

(b) The state chair must notify the county chair or county executive committee in writing or electronically that a duty has been performed under the authority of this section.

(c) If a county chair has a reasonable impediment or lacks appropriate technology to perform any administrative duty of the county chair related to the conduct of a primary election within the time required by law, the county chair may request that the state chair, or the state chair's designee, perform the duty instead of the county chair.

(d) The state chair may act in the role of the county chair for the purposes of Subchapter D, Chapter 173, with the approval of the secretary of state.

(e) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to implement this section in accordance with the conduct of elections and with party rule.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 828 (H.B. 1735), Sec. 48, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1131 (H.B. 2640), Sec. 32, eff. September 1, 2019.